Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.396

[Art. 43] Statute of limitations.

(1) A person charged with desertion or absence without leave in time of war, or with aiding the enemy or with mutiny may be tried and punished at any time without limitation.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person charged with desertion in time of peace or with the offense punishable under RCW 38.38.784 is not liable to be tried by court-martial if the offense was committed more than three years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person charged with any offense is not liable to be tried by court-martial or punished under RCW 38.38.132 if the offense was committed more than two years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command or before the imposition of punishment under RCW 38.38.132.

(4) Periods in which the accused was absent from territory in which the state has the authority to apprehend the accused, or in the custody of civil authorities, or in the hands of the enemy, shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this section.

(5) If charges or specifications are dismissed as defective or insufficient for any cause and the period prescribed by the applicable statute of limitations:

(a) Has expired; or

(b) Will expire within one hundred eighty days after the date of dismissal of the charges and specifications[,]

[then] trial and punishment under new charges and specifications are not barred by the statute of limitations if the conditions specified in subsection (6) of this section are met.

(6) The conditions referred to in subsection (5) of this section are that the new charges and specifications must:

(a) Be received by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command within one hundred eighty days after the dismissal of the charges or specifications; and

(b) Allege the same acts or omissions that were alleged in the dismissed charges or specifications or allege acts or omissions that were included in the dismissed charges or specifications.

[ 2009 c 378 s 19; 1989 c 48 s 42; 1963 c 220 s 45.]